Mississippi, session 2026, SB2012.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 9-11-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 9-11-9.  (1)  Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, justice court judges shall have jurisdiction of all actions for the recovery of debts or damages or personal property, where the principal of the debt, the amount of the demand, or the value of the property sought to be recovered shall not exceed Three Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($3,500.00). (2)  Justice court judges shall have jurisdiction of all actions filed pursuant to Title 89, Chapter 8, Mississippi Code of 1972 for the recovery of debts or damages, where the principal of the debt, the amount of the demand, or the value of the property sought to be recovered shall not exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00). (3)  The justice court judges shall have no pecuniary interest in the outcome of any action once suit has been filed. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.